The Project Gutenberg eBook of Onanism display'd:, by

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms
of the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at
www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the United States, you
will have to check the laws of the country where you are located before
using this eBook.

Title: Onanism display'd:
       being, I. an enquiry into the true nature of Onan’s sin. II. of
       the modern Onanists. III. of self-pollution, its causes, and
       consequences; with three extraordinary cases, of two young
       gentlemen and a lady, who were very much addicted to this crime.
       IV. of nocturnal-pollutions natural and forc’d. V. the great
       sin of self-pollution, with the judgment of the most eminent
       divines upon this subject. VI. a dissertation concerning
       generation, with a curious description of the parts, and of their
       proper functions, &c. according to the latest, and most
       approv’d anatomical discoveries

Release Date: November 7, 2022 [eBook #69311]

Language: English

Produced by: Richard Tonsing and the Online Distributed Proofreading
             Team at https://www.pgdp.net (This file was produced from
             images generously made available by The Internet Archive)

*** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK ONANISM DISPLAY'D: ***





ONANISM
DISPLAY’D:
BEING,
I. An Enquiry into the true Nature of ONAN’S SIN.
II. Of the Modern _Onanists_.
III. Of _Self-Pollution_, its Causes, and Consequences; with three
extraordinary Cases, of two Young Gentlemen and a Lady, who were very
much Addicted to this Crime.
IV. Of _Nocturnal-Pollutions_ Natural and Forc’d.
V. The Great Sin of _Self-Pollution_, with the Judgment of the most
Eminent Divines upon this Subject.
VI. A Dissertation concerning _Generation_, with a curious Description
of the Parts, and of their proper Functions, _&c._ according to the
latest, and most approv’d Anatomical Discoveries.


                Made _English_ from the _Paris_ Edition.

                          THE SECOND EDITION.

                              __LONDON__:

  Printed for E. CURLL, over against St. _Dunstan_’s Church in
    _Fleet-street_. MDCCXIX. (Price 1 _s._ 6 _d._)




[Illustration]

                                PREFACE.


_The Reader will immediately be sensible, that I have been led into the
first part of this Treatise upon tracing the Impositions and
Inconsistencies of the Author of a Pamphlet Entitled _Onania_; and for
the latter part it may be easily concluded to proceed from no other
Motive, but the Dictates of Nature._

_It was impossible for an Author of any Spirit, after a particular
description of the unnatural use of the Parts, that he could finish his
Labours without thoroughly examining their admiral Structure: They being
no less curious than delightful to a Youthful Swain, that’s fir’d with
Imagination._

_The infinite number of fine Vessels are pleasing in Representation, as
well as otherways Ravishing, and the Nerves and Arteries are equally
beautiful, as they are transporting. The great and exquisite sense of
the Parts of _Generation_, give an Enjoyment transcending all others;
and the Wisdom of our Creator, for the support of the World, cannot be
too sufficiently admir’d, in that Man is propagated by an excess of
Pleasure._

_The following Treatise, I have by no means compos’d to give a loose to
Debauchery. I have only persu’d the common Rules of Anatomy in this way
of Writing, and interspers’d a great variety of curious Observations and
natural Consequences as yet unobserv’d, and I was naturally induc’d to
it more for the Information of Mankind in general, than for the Sons of
_Æsculapius_ in particular. The Gentleman of all Ranks not
superannuated, may find some Pleasure in perusing it, and the fair Sex
will meet with such ample Instructions, as not to fail in the choice of
an agreeable Person, for the amorous Combat._

_For my _Dissertation_ upon the _Generation_ of _Man_, I am chiefly
oblig’d to _Messieurs Lamy_, and _Dionis_,[1] those two excellent
Anatomists; and if, in some parts of my Performance, I seem more
Ludicrous than any Author that has hitherto writ on the Subject; you’ll
find on due consideration, ’tis owing to a more exact Enquiry; and
Curiosity is not easily satisfied in the depth of the secrets of Nature.
And I hope what I have mention’d from a Learned _Casuist_,[2] will be a
sufficient Antidote against the unlawful use of those curious Parts I
have so particularly described; as an Addition to which I farther
recommend a small Treatise (not long since publish’d,) Entitled,
__ESSAYS__ relating to the _Conduct of Life_, which contain sufficient
and easy Instructions for a regular _OEconomy_, not only where the
Passions are prevalent, but in all the Vicissitudes incident to Human
Nature._

Footnote 1:

  Dissertation sur la Generation de L’Homme. Par _Monsieur Dionis, Paris
  1697_.

Footnote 2:

  Traite de l’Impuritie, par _Monsieur Ostervald_.

_In the Writing of this small Work I carelesly omitted a material
scrutiny of a Paragraph in _Onania; Page 16_. says this Author, ‘some
Women are with held from being Prostitutes by their covetousness only:
Others for nothing else, but the fear of Diseases, or the having of
Children. Lascivious Widows, who understand the World have reason to
scruple second Marriages on many accounts; some love their Liberty;
others their Money; and if they value their Reputation, they’ll not dare
to venture on unlawful Embraces; whereas in Self-pollution, neither the
Cautious, nor the Covetous imagine that they have any thing to fear.” I
take it that this very plainly encourages the Sin of Self-pollution, if
I may be allow’d to deduce the Consequences of the latter from the
former; for he first says rightly, that unlawful Embraces are injurious
to Reputations; but then insinuates that Self-pollution may be practis’d
without any Apprehensions. This and many other parts of his Treatise,
demonstrate his View to be the sale of his Medicines, though with a
great deal of Cant he pretends the contrary, besides the very tacking of
his Apothecary’s-shop, to his stupid Performance, without any farther
considerations sufficiently shews his real Intentions. And I am so far
from imitating this ignorant _Empirick_, that the only Remedy I
prescribe, is that Infallible _Specifick_, in every ones power,
__CHASTITY__._

[Illustration]




[Illustration]

                                ONANISM
                               DISPLAY’D.




                            _INTRODUCTION._


The Author of a late Pamphlet entitled _ONANIA_ has by a Bundle of
Theological Phrases, Scripture Quotations, and an affected Simplicity,
attempted to possess the World with an Opinion, that his Designs in
publishing that Treatise, were meerly with spiritual Views, and out of a
tender regard to the preservation of the Healths and Constitutions of
the degenerate part of Mankind, without any the least Mercenary
Expectations; and since it may possibly bear this Construction with
Persons carelesly perusing his Performance, and the ignorant Multitude:
I shall make it my Business to set forth the Absurdity, inconsistency,
and imposture of this supercilious Scribler in every part; to prove that
his Treatise tends to the encouragement of Lewdness and Debauchery; that
his own Medicines promote the very Sin, he, for Interest sake, takes
upon him to Discountenance; and to demonstrate, that he is really
ignorant of what was the Crime of _ONAN_. But I shall premise that my
Scheme is no ways calculated to propagate any manner of Uncleanness, but
on the contrary to discourage the practice of self-pollution, by
illustrating the Sin more particularly; and enumerating more
extraordinary Instances than hitherto any Author has done on the
Subject.

I agree with this Author in the Opinion of the Divine he has quoted,
that Self-pollution is a Crime in it self, monstrous and unnatural; its
Practice filthy and odious, its Guilt crying, and its Consequences
ruinous: It destroys conjugal Affection, perverts natural Inclination,
and tends to extinguish the hopes of Posterity; but I take leave to
observe that the Author of _ONANIA_ is egregiously mistaken in fixing
this Crime upon _ONAN_, as I shall incontestably prove when I have gone
thro’ my Examination of his trifling Performance, which I purpose to do
with all the exactness imaginable.

And first, in Page 14. After setting forth Ignorance to be the first
cause of Self-pollution, this Author goes on and tells you, that the
second is the secrecy with which Self-pollution may be committed: All
other Actions of uncleanness (says he) must have a Witness, this needs
none. Some lustful Women of sense, have made all the outward shew of
Virtue and Morality that can be requir’d; they have had prudence enough,
in the midst of strong Desires, to refuse disadvantageous Matches, and
yet have abandon’d themselves to this Vice, when at the same time they
would rather have died than betray’d a weakness to any Man living, as
afterwards, becoming Penitents, they have confessed themselves. And
again some young Men of vicious Inclinations, have either naturally, or
for want of a liberal Education been shame-fac’d to excess; they have
not dar’d to look upon a Woman, and their Bashfulness has secur’d them
from every act of Impurity but this. From all which it is evident that
the secrecy of this Sin, has betray’d many into it, whom hardly any
thing else would have tempted.

In answer to this, tho’ it must be confess’d that secrecy in some
measure promotes this Vice, yet Ignorance and the want of a liberal
Education can in no respect be constru’d to have an equal Effect: An
ignorant Person may be rationally presum’d to be less influenc’d by
impure Imaginations, than a Person of a tolerable share of Sense; his
Ignorance may be so extensive, as to cloud all manner of Enjoyments, and
allow him no Thoughts of pursuing imaginary pleasures; whilst the Man of
sense is perpetually devising new Diversions, and proportions his
Enjoyment to the extent of his Capacity; he vigorously pursues the
Tracts of Lewdness and Debauchery, and is restless and uneasy, until he
has acted in all Scenes, and gone thro’ the utmost variety of brutal
Enjoyments; this I take to be highly conspicuous in the Rakes of the
Town, who are frequently Persons of sprightly Wit, and endu’d with no
small share of substantial Sense.

And as for the want of a liberal Education, I cannot easily guess at the
meaning of the Author, unless it be the want of being train’d up in the
Hundreds of _Drury_, it being very certain that in a Scholastick
Education, the perusal of ludicrous Authors, which all Youths of Spirit
are fond of making choice of for their Studies, excites them to
uncleanness infinitely beyond Ignorance; and that the want of Education
should occasion such an invincible Bashfulness, as to deter a Person
from looking on a Woman, is such an imposition upon the illiterate part
of Mankind, which make up at least three Parts in four of the Creation,
that nothing can be like it, when we consider that the Enjoyment of a
Woman is so natural, that no bounds of Shame will confine it, and that
Persons in all other Respects modest, have a strong propensity to
copulation, and cannot conquer this passion, like others more visible to
the World, by Shame or any other means.

Shame I take to be more a defect in Nature, and want of Resolution to
act in Publick, than to discourage the private Amours of Youth, which by
a due management may be easily carried on with sufficient secrecy: And
we oftentimes find a bashful Person more inclinable to Vice than the Man
of assurance, tho’ he supports the Character with more Hipocrisy; his
Intrigues are carried on with an entire secrecy, and he can enter upon
his Lewdness with an air of Gravity and Innocence, when the Sinner of
Resolution as frankly owns his Experience, as he commits the Crime. But
to go on with this Author, in page 17. He says, it is the general
Opinion, that the shameless are the worst of People, yet shame when ill
plac’d, has often wrought worse Effects, than the reverse alone has been
able to produce. When a Bastard Infant is found Dead, and the Mother,
lately deliver’d without Witness, is not able to prove either that she
had made Provision for it, or during her pregnancy imparted the secret
to another, besides the Father, our _English_ Law, without any other
Evidence, presumes the Woman to have murder’d the Child. From whence it
is evident the Legislators must have suppos’d that some Women may have
cruelty enough to commit the most unnatural Murder of all, and at the
same time want Courage to bear shame.

This penetrating Author does not consider, that ’tis not so much the
want of Courage to bear a present shame, as to prevent a future expence
in the maintaining and breeding up a Child, which most commonly
occasions these unnatural Murders; and where a Crime of this Nature can
be perpetrated with secrecy, so that the guilty Persons may come off
with impunity, I take it that in all Cases the incumbrance is more
consider’d than the shame.

I am not of his Opinion in Page 18. that Women are equally immodest with
Men, and that Custom and Education only prevents their shewing it. For
in the Infancy of Children, before the force of Education can possibly
take place, or sense prevail, as a Guide to their Actions, we frequently
find an abounding Modesty in the Female, and a large share of Boldness
in the Male, produc’d from the same Loins, and this I have observ’d is
generally the Case, which can proceed from nothing but Nature.

And in Page 19. says this Author, if Children were strictly forbid never
to touch their Eyes or Nose, but with their Handkerchiefs, and that only
upon very urgent Necessities; if likewise they saw every Body comply
with this Custom, and it was counted abominable to touch them with their
naked Hands, I can’t see why this might not be as shocking to them when
grown up, as now the most guilty Denudations are to well bred People.
Now this curious Observation upon the efficacy of Custom being
introduc’d in a Paragraph treating of Modesty and Chastity, I appeal to
all Persons of any sense or discernment, whether it does not imply, that
all Modesty and Virtue is establish’d only by Custom, and whether it
does not entirely destroy the notion of an innate Principle. This
concludes his first Chapter, and I take it to be very evident, that
under a Cloak of Divinity, this Author slily propagates Doctrines fatal
to Religion, and highly reflecting on the Reputations of the Virtuous.

Chap. II. Page 25. In Women, he says, Self-pollution, if frequently
practis’d, relaxes and spoils the retentive Faculty, occasions the
_Fluor Albus_, an obnoxious, as well as perplexing illness attending
that Sex, which upon account of the Womb, may draw on a whole Legion of
Diseases; among other disorders, it makes them look pale, and those who
are not of a good Complexion, swarthy and hagged. It frequently is the
cause of Hysterick Fits, and sometimes by draining away all the radical
Moisture causes Consumptions. But what it more often produces than
either, is Barrenness, a misfortune very afflictive to them, because
seldom to be redress’d; He seems to make very little difference between
the fatal Consequences of Self-pollution in either of the Sexes, when it
must be allow’d to be great, on duly considering the situation of the
parts; the Male can with abundantly more ease effect a titillation on
his external Testicles, than the Female facilitate the least pleasure in
her Womb; and as the difficulty is greater, it must deter a constant
practice, and consequently not be attended with Symptoms, equally
direful. And I doubt not, but this Author would much rather see a Legion
of Gallants waiting upon a Female, than one single act of
Self-pollution, his Interest being more nearly concern’d in the vending
of his Venereal Medicines.

Agreeable to this, in Page 46. Treating of Repentance, he goes on, it is
not enough for Youth to renounce their Crime, without renouncing
likewise all the approaches to it. All the several species of Impurity,
and the defilements of either Body or Mind, all lewd Actions, wanton
Glances, impure Thoughts and Desires, together with such familiarities
as expose to Temptations, all obscene Discourse or Expressions, and
which are contrary to Chastity. It is true this Renunciation may appear
difficult at first, and will occasion no small trouble to those that
have contracted a vicious Habit, of giving themselves up to all sorts of
Passions: But People must couragiously resolve to overcome themselves,
it being far better to deny themselves in those Things, and to cross
their own Inclinations for a time, than by pursuing them to perish
eternally. _It is profitable that one of _their_ Members should perish,
and not that _their_ whole Body should be cast into Hell._ The tacking
of this Quotation from Scripture, by a dispenser of Medicines,
pretending only to cure Venereal Maladies, seems very plain and
demonstrable to be done with a design of increasing Whoredom and
Fornication, at the same time he pretends to lash the Crime of
Self-pollution; what he can otherwise mean by the perishing of one
_Member_, is to me a mystery; and in many other parts of his Treatise he
slily insinuates Notions and Comparisons no way coherent, to promote his
Profession of Quackism.

In Page 54. After he has inserted a pretended Letter from a Young
Gentleman in the Country, setting forth the dreadful Miseries he
labour’d under thro’ a frequent practice of Self-pollution, _viz._
repeating it eight Times an hour; our Author solemnly declares, that he
concluded this Letter with requesting his Advice, and informing him that
he never carnally knew any Person (I suppose meaning neither Man nor
Woman) or defil’d himself otherwise, than by Self-pollution. Setting
aside the very great suspicion of this, and the rest of the Letters in
this Treatise being forg’d, there being no Names of the Writers, to whom
directed, or any Dates to them, the Author Acts very inconsistently, in
not setting forth the conclusion of the Letter relating to carnal
knowledge in the Letter it self, but instead thereof, he imposes upon
the World, his own Affirmation, as the only Authority. If he be himself
the Author of those Letters, as I suppose he may, indeed it has equal
sanction from his own Mouth deliver’d at another time, but if he be not
the Inventer of those Bundles of Nonsense, certainly the Genuine Letter
ought to be inserted verbatim to the end. And why he mentions that part
of the Letter at all, unless it be with a secret Design of propagating
other uncleanness more detestable as it brings a double Guilt, I cannot
well understand, since he no where takes notice of the calamities
attending Whoredom and Fornication, tho’ the Crimes are often repeated.

Towards the Conclusion of this Treatise, in Page 74. The more easily to
impose upon the publick, a solemn Declaration is made, that he neither,
has, or ever design’d to have the least Interest or share in the
Profits, that now are, or hereafter may accrue from the sale of the
Medicines; this seems to be an Evasion equally contriv’d to any of the
foregoing; is it not easy to imagine, that, (tho’ his Performance is
compos’d of stupidity) he is not himself the Author, even of that? And
that this is not his Declaration, but that of the Writer of his insipid
Treatise; and whether this be not a natural Construction, I submit to
the Determination of all impartial Readers. There are several other
Fallacies and Impostures, which might be trac’d through his trifling
Performance, but I shall content my self with the particulars I have
already examin’d: And as in Page 63. He mentions the Advice of
_Boccalini_, given as an Antidote against Whoredom, _viz._ that Persons
that way inclin’d should carry about with them, a well drawn Picture, of
the most perfect and faultless Beauty that ever appear’d in Flesh and
Blood, pencil’d over again with rotten Teeth, blear Eyes, and Noseless;
and that whenever Desires of the Flesh stir, they would take a sober
View of it, and seriously consider what they are about to do, and the
Consequences, which no doubt would damp their Inclinations. I shall
insert some particulars of this nature, which will give a more lively
Idea of the Folly and Madness, and more effectually deter a pursuit of
carnal Pleasures from Sir _Roger L’Estrange_’s Translation of
_QUEVEDO_’s Visions.


In the fifth Vision of the World, a Dialogue is begun between a Young
Libertine, and a grave Old Gentleman; ‘says the Libertine, there past by
a Lady of Pleasure, of so excellent a Shape, and Garb, that it was
impossible to see her without a Passion for her, and no less impossible
to look upon any Thing else so long as she was to be seen: They that had
seen her once, were to see her no more: for she turn’d her Face still to
new Comers: Her Motion was graceful and free, one while she’d stare ye
full in the Eyes, under colour of opening her Hood, to set it in better
order: By and by she’d steal a look at ye with one Eye, and a side Face,
from the corner of her Vizor; like a Witch that’s afraid to be known
when she comes from a Catterwal; and then out comes the delicate Hand,
and discovers the more delicious Neck and Breasts, to adjust the
Handkerchief or the Scarf; or to remove some other grievance that made
her Ladyship uneasy. Her Hair was most artificially dispos’d into
careless Rings; and the best Red and White in Nature was in her Cheeks;
if that of her Lips and Teeth did not exceed it. In a word, all she
look’d upon were her own; the Old Man opposing this Romance; says the
Young Gentleman, he must be either Blind or Barbarous that’s proof
against the Charms of so divine a Beauty; nor would any but a Sot let
slip the blessed opportunity, of so fair an Encounter; that he that has
her, has all that’s lovely or desirable in Nature: What lightning does
she carry in her Eyes! What Charms and Chains in her Looks and Motions,
for the very Souls of her Beholders! Was ever any Thing so clear, as her
Forehead? Or so black as her Eye-brows? One would swear that her
Complection had taken a Tincture of Vermillion and Milk: And that Nature
had brought her into the World with Pearl and Rubies in her Mouth, to
speak all in little, she’s the Master-piece of the Creation, worthy of
infinite praise, and equal to our largest Desires and Imaginations.

‘Here the Old Gentleman interrupted the Young Libertine, and told him he
was a Man of much Wonder and small Experience, and deliver’d over to the
Spirit of Folly and Blindness. The Truth of it is, said he, that this
prodigious Beauty of yours, hires all by the day; and if you did but see
this Puppet taken to pieces, you would find her little else but Paint
and Plaister. To begin her Anatomy at the head; you must know that the
Hair she wears, is borrow’d of a Tire-Woman, for her own was blown off
by an unlucky Wind from the coast of _Naples_; or if she has any left,
she keeps it private, as a Memorial of her Antiquity; she is beholden to
the Pencil for her Eye-brows and Complection: And upon the whole matter
she’s but an old Picture refresht; all that you see of her that’s good,
comes from distill’d Waters, Essences, Powders, and the like; and to see
the washing of her Face would fright the Devil: She abounds in
Pomanders, sweet Waters, Spanish Pockets, perfum’d Drawers; and all
little enough to qualifie the poisonous Whiffs she sends from her Toes
and Armpits, which would otherwise out stink Ten Thousand Pole-Cats: She
cannot chuse but kiss well, for her Lips are perpetually bath’d in Oil
and Grease; and he that embraces her, shall find the better half of her
the Taylors, and only a stuffing of Cotton, and Canvas to supply the
defects of her Body. What do you think of your ador’d Beauty now?’

And in another place of the same Author, the following account is given
of a Visit to ill-favour’d Women; ‘some had their Faces so pounc’d and
speckled, as if they had been scarified, and newly past the cupping
Glass; with a World of little Plaisters, long, round, square; and
briefly cut out into such variety, that it would have posed a good
Mathematician to have found out another Figure; and you would have
sworn, that they had been either at Cats-play or Cuffs: Others were
scraping their Faces with pieces of Glass; tearing up their Eye-brows by
the Roots like mad; and some that had none to tear, were fetching out of
their black Boxes, such as they could get or make: Others were powdering
and curling the false Locks, or fastning their new Ivory Teeth in the
place of their old Ebony ones: Some were chewing Limmon-peal or
Cinnamon, to countenance a foul Breath; and raising themselves upon
their Ciopines, that their View might be the fairer, and their fall the
deeper: Others were quarrelling with their Looking-glasses, for shewing
them such Hags countenances; and cursing the _State_ of _Venice_, for
entertaining no better Workmen; some with their Hogs-grease and Pomatum,
were sleeking and polishing their Faces; and indeed, their Fore-heads
were bright and shining, though there were neither Suns nor Stars in
that Firmament: And others were daubing one another, to take away the
Heats and Buboes; so far does a Woman’s Wit and Invention carry her, to
her own Destruction.’ And in another Vision lewd Women are justly
call’d, _the Devil’s Factresses_.

This is a small Digression from my Subject, but as I was naturally lead
into it, by the Treatise I have been examining, and it may tend to the
discouragement of unlawful Pleasures, I hope it is excuseable. I now
proceed to shew that the Author is mistaken in the Sin of _ONAN_, and to
demonstrate what was really his Crime.




                               _CHAP._ I.
         _Of_ _ONAN_’s _Crime; and the Sin of_ SELF-POLLUTION.


The Text of Scripture runs thus. _And _Judah_ said unto __ONAN__, Go in
unto thy Brother’s Wife, and Marry her, and raise up Seed to thy
Brother. And __ONAN__ knew that the Seed should not be his; and it came
to pass, when he went in unto his Brother’s Wife, that he spilled it on
the Ground, lest that he should give Seed to his Brother._ 38. Chap.
Genesis, Verses 8, 9, 10.

Though some Authors seem to make _ONAN_’s chief Crime to be
Self-pollution, yet the learned Bishop _Patrick_, in his Commentary upon
the _38th Chapter _of_ Genesis_, is of a contrary Opinion, _viz._

  ‘Verse 8. _Go in unto thy Brother’s Wife._ This was an ancient Custom
  in force by the Law of _Moses_, which only exacted what had been
  formerly practis’d, _viz._ that when a Man died without issue, his
  next Brother should Marry his Wife. _Deut. 25. 5._

  ‘_And raise up Seed to thy Brother_; is meant preserve thy Brother’s
  Name and Family, by begetting a Child, which may be accounted his, and
  inherit his Estate. For so the Law was, that the first Born of such a
  Match, was not to be look’d upon, as a Child of him that begot him;
  but as his Brother’s, who was the Mother’s first Husband; though all
  the following Children were to be his own.

  ‘Verse 9. _ONAN_ _knew that the Seed should not be accounted his in
  the first Born, but his Brothers._ And least the Child should be born
  in the Name of his Brother; v. 10. _The Thing which he did displeased
  the Lord._ This made the Sin the more heinous, that he acted against
  the divine Promise made to _Abraham_, concerning the multiplying of
  his Seed.

  ‘The contract of Marriage was so understood in those Days, that if the
  Husband died without Issue, the Woman was oblig’d to Marry his next
  Brother, and as long as any of his Brethren remain’d, they were bound
  to Marry his Wife, and preserve their Brother’s Memory, or solemnly
  renounce, to their very great Infamy. This was so well known, that no
  new contract was enjoyn’d in such a Case; for the first Husband being
  dead, she and the next Brother were Man and Wife, without any farther
  Agreement or Ceremony, by Virtue of the Original Law.’

The learned Prelate in this Comment, omits mentioning the spilling of
the Seed, but it may be rationally presum’d he did it not so much out of
a regard to Modesty, as its being a trifling part of the Charge against
_ONAN_; since he determines _ONAN_’s great Crime to be his not complying
with the Law of _Moses_, in the Marriage of his Brothers Wife; tho’ he
adds, that his Sin was the more heinous for his acting contrary to the
promise made to _Abraham_, in relation to the multiplying of his Seed.

What provok’d _ONAN_ to the Breach of this Law, I take to be evident,
was his not being allow’d the Reputation of begetting the first Child on
his Brothers Wife, which in all Marriages is attended with more
satisfaction, than any of the future Progeny.

There might be other probable Reasons given for _ONAN_’s breaking this
Law of _Moses_; as envy to the Memory of his deceas’d Brother, dislike
or prejudice to his Wife, _&c._ But to Comment a little farther upon the
38 _Chapter_ of _Genesis_, in respect to _ONAN_’s Crime, it may not be
amiss to examine some preceding Verses.

Verse. 2. _And_ Judah _saw there, a Daughter of a certain_ Cananite,
_whose Name was_ Shuah; _and he took her, and went in unto her. And she
conceiv’d, and bare a Son, and he call’d his Name_ Er. By this, and many
other parts of the Scripture it is apparent, that the Words _going in_
unto a Woman, were meant in those times actual Copulation, so that when
_ONAN_ _went in_ unto his Brother’s Wife, it must be constru’d, that he
began the pleasure of Matrimony, though, he did not perfect it by reason
he spilt his Seed on the Ground; that is, he withdrew from his Brothers
Wife, and did not consummate the Marriage; which displeas’d the Lord,
wherefore he slew him.

Agreeable to this in some measure, is the modern Custom amongst Persons
of distinction in their amorous Intrigues; who after they are actually
ingag’d in the pleasures of _Venus_, by a sudden ereption of the
Privities, separate from the Female the instant they feel the
Titillation in the extreme Parts, and before the _Emissio Seminis_; to
prevent the effects of a teeming Womb, which would not only occasion a
considerable expence, but expose the Female, and very much impair the
Beauty of her Form. And of this nature, I take the Sin of _ONAN_ to be,
in relation to his spilling his Seed on the Ground, though not committed
with the same design.

These particulars fully shew, that _ONAN_’s Sin was not Self-pollution,
as laid down by the Author of _ONANIA_, and for that he had the
Assistance of his Brother’s Wife. I come now to the Sin of
Self-pollution, and begin with the Causes.

I am by no means of the Author’s Opinion, that Self-pollution is
entirely occasion’d by Ignorance, Secrecy, Shame, or other particular
Causes mention’d in his Treatise, as I have already observ’d, with my
Reasons confuting the same; to which I may add, this farther, that few,
or no Persons can be ignorant, that Self-pollution is a Sin. I look upon
it to be more a natural Distemper occasion’d by a vicious ferment of the
Blood, than to proceed from any of the Causes set forth by the Author of
Self-pollution, and that this may be agitated by lewd Company, Obscene
Pictures, _&c._ It is impossible, that ignorance can increase this
Crime, when it is esteem’d the Mother of Devotion, and in my Opinion,
the firmest limits to Chastity. Without some experience, no considerable
progress can be made, and ’tis the highest inconsistency to call an
experienc’d Person ignorant.

Other Causes of Self-pollution, I take it may be justly attributed to
the very great hazards Young Gentlemen are constantly expos’d to with
Women of the Town (not that I allow any unlawful desires) for tho’ the
Crime of Self-pollution be in its nature heinous, and the Consequences
are to be fear’d by all considerate Persons, yet the Sin doth not in any
respect seem so dreadful to vigorous Youth, as that of Whoredom, and the
Calamities attending, are generally more remote in prospect. A Clap or a
Pox will immediately ensue in the most terrible manner (the Beauty of
the Front, and the most valuable parts of the Body, being particularly
in danger) in the case of Copulation with an unsound Woman, when the
consequences of Self-pollution only steal on you by degrees, and will be
a considerable space before the direful Effects shall be visible. This I
take to be a principal Cause of Self-pollution, especially where Persons
have suffer’d in their Intrigues with lewd Women; and what encreases it
in this case, is the pernicious Salt of a transmissive Nature,
oftentimes remaining in the center of the Blood, upon taking unbounded
quantities of Mercurial Preparations; some Young Gentlemen have
confess’d to me, that after the cure of the secret Disease by
Quack-physicians, their Inclinations have encreas’d, with the number of
their venerial Maladies, which can proceed from no other cause than a
pollution of the Blood occasion’d by the Dregs of ill prepar’d
Medicines.

I have known two very remarkable Cases of this kind in the Country. One
was a half witted young Fellow, being with artifice entic’d to the act
of Fornication with an unclean Woman, who after a cure of the Disease he
receiv’d by her, was so strangely addicted to Self-pollution, that at
length there was far greater difficulty to preserve his impair’d
Carcass, than in curing of his nauseous Distemper, notwithstanding, he
had it with severity: He would sit down upon the Floor, and with Eyes
lift up violate Nature in a seeming Transport, and oftentimes repeat
this unnatural Sin, with an uncommon pleasure: At last he confess’d it,
and on a private Examination declar’d, that he never had any inclination
to Self-pollution, before he had receiv’d his venerial Injury, and
largely taken of the Surgeons Preparations, tho’ this Woman was not the
first that he had carnally known. The other Case within my knowledge,
was, that of a rakish Young Gentleman, who having run through his
Fortune in Extravagancies, particularly on the fair Sex, when he could
no longer splendidly subsist, or afford the expence of unlawful
Pleasures, being perpetually tormented with a violent inclination to
Women; at last after a long continuance of Self-pollution, he
couragiously Castrated himself, as the only cure of his vicious
Appetite. But the next News I heard, as indeed I expected, was, that he
had with equal resolution shot himself through the Head.

’Tis very certain, that Persons in mean Circumstances, are thereby in
many Respects render’d unable to pursue their darling Vices; but where
the Principles are vitiated, or the Passions prevalent, there is no
Shield of Self-defence against ill Actions: The Person wholly void of
Honesty, will commit Thefts and Robberies upon the Persons of others to
enrich himself; and the lustful Person will satisfy his Brutal
inclinations by Friction, or other abominable Enjoyments, for want of
ability, to purchase more acceptable Crimes: And as the want of
Circumstances is many times a cause of Self-pollution, so the Person in
possession of a large Fortune, is frequently guilty of the Sin of
Whoredom, accompanied with more dreadful Consequences, and Nature only,
under the severest Discipline, must in all Cases regulate the lustful
Appetite.

The design of providence, for the preservation of Mankind in a State of
Innocence, is visible throughout all the works of the Creation; there is
no condition of Life, but a Person may go thro’ free from Guilt and
Infamy; and particularly in Uncleanness, Nocturnal-pollution proceeding
meerly from Nature without force, is certainly intended to correct
lustful Inclinations; but when it arises from vicious contemplations,
and impure Ideas conceiv’d in the Mind, it is a sinful Act, though not
equally criminal to Self-pollution.

Pollution by the hand of a Woman, is always attended with more fatal
consequences to the Man than any other; the impure Thoughts are more
strongly impress’d by the presence of the Female, than its possible in
her absence, and the imaginations so heighten’d by her Touch, as to
commit the greater violence on Nature. By this, the parts are more
considerably strain’d, and their natural Strength and Vigour abated.
This naturally leads me to the various ways of Self-pollution in wanton
Females, which are so intolerable, that Modesty forbids a particular
Description. I shall only mention, that a Lascivious Woman, by the use
of a pleasurable Toy, and an injection of Milk, or other Moisture, may
possibly continue Self-pollution for a longer space than copulation with
a Man, no Spirits being drain’d or Strength exhausted by the means
herein applied; and ’tis reported that some lewd Females will commence
this vile practice, before their Privities are fledg’d with Maturity.

To demonstrate the consequences of a lewd Conversation in regard to the
Crime of Self-pollution, I shall here present you with an ample account
of a Club of Young Gentlemen, I have been inform’d, was not many Years
ago establish’d in, or near _Long-Acre_; the most abominable Nursery of
Lewdness and Debauchery, perhaps, that ever was heard of in any Country,
unless it be in the remote parts of _Europe_ amongst the vile Sects of
incestuous _Adamites_, whom Histories mention, when the Words _increase
and multiply_, were repeated in their religious Service (which was very
common) they immediately extinguish’d their Candles, and promiscuously
mix’d in carnal Enjoyments. This Club ’tis said, was held thrice a Week
at the House of a noted Victualler, who was a Stranger to the Actions of
his Guests for a considerable time; they had a Supper and plenty of
strong Liquors constantly provided to their no small Expence; they were
govern’d by a President of the Night, who was commonly elected after
Supper, and the whole Assembly struggled for this Honour: The method of
Election was thus; every one according to his Seniority advanc’d himself
in turn upon a high Joint-stool plac’d against a Wall, and with a sort
of Emulation, there practis’d Self-pollution as long, as his strength
would permit, and he that repeated the Sin the greatest number of times,
was immediately declar’d their Chief for the next time of meeting: And
to facilitate their unnatural Pleasures; their Eatings generally
consisted of strong Soops, Gravies, Fish, Jellies, and other
provocatives to Lust; and their whole Conversation turn’d on their
Excellency and Perfection in this most detestable Crime. This Account I
have had of this Club, with this Addition, that a Member of it might be
known by his spindle Shanks, fallen Jaws, and pale wither’d Countenance,
but as it is not within my own knowledge, I cannot aver it to be fact,
and to me it seems so monstrous as not to be credited in the whole, what
ever it may in part; however I thought fit to insert it, to render the
Crime the more odious and hateful to all.

And to this I may add other pernicious Consequences proceeding from this
Crime, as an irrecoverable Impotency, which renders a Man inanimate,
intoxicates his reason, and debases Nature, so as to occasion the
_Diabetis_ and other fatal lingering Diseases; for the aliment of the
Blood is so far vitiated and impair’d by a frequent repetition of this
Sin, that it is wholly unable to perform its office of Circulation with
any regularity.

Thus I have detected the several Fallacies, Inconsistencies, and
Impositions of the Author of _ONANIA_; prov’d that he is mistaken in the
Crime of _ONAN_; that the design, of his Book was to encourage Lewdness,
and thereby promote the sale of destructive Medicines, which many times
occasion a conflux of Humours, and incurable Diseases; shewn that Quack
Preparations promote the very Sin he with views of Interest pretends to
discountenance, set forth the real Crime of _ONAN_, and the Causes and
fatal Consequences of Self-pollution: I now proceed to the heinousness
of the _SIN_.




[Illustration]

                              _CHAP._ II.
   _The_ _SIN_ _of_ _SELF-POLLUTION_, _the means to avoid it, and to
                          attain_ _CHASTITY_.


The Learned _Ostervald_ treating of the several Species of Uncleanness,
says it is easy to discern ‘that impure Actions are forbidden for two
Reasons. First, because they are likely means of carrying Men to the
grosser Crime: People don’t ordinarily arrive at the height of
Wickedness all at once, but by certain Steps and Degrees. They begin
with what they think lawful; they accustom themselves to violate the
rules of Chastity in such Instances, as they perswade themselves, can
have no great hurt in them: But then from these lesser Offences, they
proceed to others, whose Wickedness they cannot but be sensible of; and
so at length they fall into the more horrid Crime. But in the second
place, though we should never come thus far, and our unchaste Actions
should never push us on to the utmost Licentiousness, they however
defile the Soul; they increase the inclination to Uncleanness, and
withdraw from God; as a very little Observation will inform those, who
allow themselves in these sort of Liberties.

‘To impure Actions, may be subjoin’d such Looks, as are contrary to
Chastity, inasmuch, as a Man may be guilty also of Sin in this respect,
whether in beholding such Objects, or in reading such Books, as may be
apt to beget unlawful Desires. It is an undoubted Truth, that impure
Passions are chiefly rais’d and inflam’d by the sight, and that it is
impossible to continue Chast without a diligent care to govern the Eyes,
and to turn them away from whatsoever might seduce the Heart. Let but
any one enquire into the Objects I am speaking of, and the Impressions
they are apt to make upon the Mind, and this will presently convince him
of the Evil and Danger of suffering his Eyes to dwell upon them: These
Objects pollute the Imagination, filling it with lustful Thoughts; and
it is only through the Temptation of sensuality, that any can fix their
Eyes upon them, or take any manner of pleasure in them. The holy
Scriptures sufficiently caution against these undue Liberties; it was by
the sight that _David_ was entic’d to commit Iniquity: And _Job_, who
liv’d at a time when moral Chastity was less known, than it has been
since, had yet learn’d, that the principal Duty of Chastity was to
regulate the Sight.’


There are many Things conducive to Chastity, as the pious example of
Superiours, a Godly Conversation, Books of Devotion, a firm Resolution,
Temperance, _&c._ And at all Seasons, Persons ought to use their utmost
Endeavours for overcoming their inclinations to Impurity; but there are
some times, and opportunities, wherein it is done far more easily than
at others. In matters of Salvation, as well, as in all others, a great
deal depends upon a choice of proper Seasons: No-body, but must have
found, that he is not always equally well disposed: Upon some occasions
a thing will appear almost insuperable, which yet will not be so at
another time: Take a Man given to any particular passion, and in the
instant, when he is seiz’d and transported with it: All you can say to
the contrary, will make no Impression upon him; yet take the same Person
out of his passion, when his Blood is cold, and you will see him very
different. The Impure have their intervals, and these longer or shorter,
and more or less frequent, according as the Habit they have contracted
is stronger or weaker; there are some, over whom this passion has so
great an Ascendency, that they are almost perpetually employ’d by it;
yet such as these have some more favourable Moments, wherein they are
capable of reflection, and wherein their Passion allows them some
respite without opposition.

But there is nothing to be done without Resolution and Confidence; and
we may be assur’d, that God’s enjoining of Chastity, is an incontestable
proof, that People may attain it: It is by no means to be presum’d, that
our great Creator, who is all Justice, would under pain of Damnation
command the observance of such Duties, as he knows to be entirely out of
our power: No, there are means of performing what he injoins, not
attended with unconquerable difficulties: And as it is he, who has
ordered these means; so has he engaged himself to second them with his
blessing, whenever we commence a sincere obedience to his Laws.

It would be strange to find any make a Question of this; but it must be
granted, that as this Duty is not to be acquir’d with equal ease at all
times, so it is not alike easy to all sorts of Persons; and some find
considerable trouble in it; and so it is in all the other Duties of
Morality: There are some, who whether from their natural Tempers and
Constitutions, or from the bad Habits they have contracted, are
violently press’d on to certain Passions, and must encounter
Self-difficulties before they can make the least conquest over them: An
eagerness of Temper, and fullness of Heat, with an ill Habit too long
indulg’d, will render Persons so prone to anger, that they must be very
diligent and watchful, and always upon their guard, or they will not be
able to avoid it; but it will very ill become these to offer this for
their excuse; for by this means, there is no Person but would be able to
vindicate himself: So in a temporal Sense, were Criminals allow’d to
plead a strong inclination and proneness of Nature, to the committing of
Crimes, there would be no such thing as Justice or Government in the
World.

Tho’ many Persons are strongly press’d to Impurity, yet it cannot be
concluded, from hence, that there are no methods of Preservation from
this Passion: If they brought themselves into this State by their own
fault, and for want of using the means proper in order to Chastity, this
is no Evidence that these means are not sufficient for their purpose:
The Case is the same here, as if a Man had fallen into a dangerous
Indisposition for not using certain Preservatives or Remedies, which
does not shew that he had no means of preventing his Sickness, but only
that he did not make a right use of them: Those who are entangled in
this dangerous Passion, and whose return to Chastity appears very
difficult, may yet be assur’d, that they may recover themselves: It is
true, they may find it troublesome at first, but then they ought to
remember, that it is but reasonable for them to cross their own
Inclinations, and bear with some inconvenience to preserve themselves
from fatal ruin: The trouble will daily lessen, and what at first seem’d
insuperable, will become at length pleasant in the performance. There
are certainly means of being Chast, and whosoever makes the Trial, will
quickly find the benefit of them: As for those that will not use them,
who will do nothing to fortify themselves, will not keep out of the way
of Temptations, nor cross their vicious Inclinations in any thing; I
confess it is my Opinion, that they will never attain any degree of
Chastity, but then they have none but themselves to blame for it; it is
their own fault, and not any defect in Religion, that they are in this
Condition: And to such the Almighty has ordain’d a proper Remedy,
whereby to avoid the excesses of the Flesh, which is _Marriage_.

Meditation is an excellent means to Purity, it excites and recalls into
the Mind, divers good Reflections, and abates the force of Temptations:
There is no matter of Religion and Piety, which may not be revolv’d in
our Minds to advantage; and there are many particular Meditations, that
have a peculiar Virtue for dissuading from pollution; such as the
presence of our Creator, Death, Resurrection, Judgment, _&c._ The
thoughts of Death, which puts an end to all our Enjoyments here, must
necessarily abate the allurements of sensual Pleasures. The thoughts of
our Resurrection will force us to have a regard to Purity: And the
thoughts of our Saviour’s Sufferings, are a powerful Motive, not to seek
our own ease, and the satisfaction of our Senses in this World.

One of the chief means of defence against Temptations to Impurity, is a
distrust of our selves. This distrust proceeds from an Opinion and Sense
of our own Weakness, and thereby a fear of being surpriz’d and ensnar’d
by Temptations; distrust will produce Vigilance, which is a second means
of defence against impure Thoughts. Persons ought to be very exact and
scrupulous, as to every thing that leads to Impurity, and not to take
too great liberty under any vain pretences. Mortification and Exercise
are very good guards against Pollution; Idleness makes People wanton and
vicious, and High-feeding very much heightens unlawful Desires.
Curiosity is frequently a cause of the wanderings of the Mind and Heart;
and a desire of satisfying it, proceeding from a secret Passion, being a
great occasion of Pollution, this also is to be guarded against: And
lastly, when Persons are under any manner of Temptations, the instant
they are sensible of impure Thoughts in the Soul, they should be
strenuously resisted. The first reception of impure Thoughts into the
Soul, shews them to be pleasing to it; and the longer they are
entertain’d there, the more this Pleasure encreases; and when this
Pleasure once prevails, the Man is no longer in a capacity to defend
himself: And there is no surer way to prevent a Conflagration, than by
thoroughly extinguishing the first spark of Fire, on its immediate
appearance.


Thus much for the means to avoid Impurity, and to attain Chastity, I
shall conclude this part of my Treatise, with what Mr. _Ostervald_
observes of the Sin of Uncleanness in general, and with a few
Reflections of my own, which may be of service to those, who make
Chastity a difficulty. ‘All Uncleanness is a palpable Violation of our
Baptismal Covenant, wherein we have solemnly oblig’d our selves to
renounce the Flesh (that is to say, all sensuality and voluptuousness)
as well as the World and the Devil. For there is no living up to this
Profession and Obligation, without being continually upon our guard
against all those sinful Lusts, which we have thus renounc’d. And
indeed, what an affront is it to God, and what vile Treachery and breach
of Covenant, when Persons have thus given up their Names to Christ, and
promis’d to obey his holy Laws; and in particular, to abstain from all
Impurity, if they shall yet draw back, and professing to know the
Almighty shall in works deny him, living in wantonness and unlawful
Pleasures, like the Gentiles, who knew him not, or rather in such
detestable Lewdnesses, as the Wiser amongst these would have abominated?
We cannot doubt, but that we are all strictly engag’d to cleanse our
selves from Filthiness, both of Flesh and Spirit, and to perfect
Holiness. And what a monstrous Incongruity must it be, for such to
indulge themselves in any carnal and sensual Immoralities, in direct
opposition to the Vow, so solemnly made against them! This must
necessarily argue a great Stupidity, and regardlessness of their Duty,
which is sufficiently blameable in any, but in Christians, who pretend
to tread in their Saviour’s Steps, and to obey all his Commandments, is
most exceedingly provoking.’


Though the Sin of Uncleanness be heinous in it self, as appears by what
has been said, and is oftentimes attended with a train of Crimes, as
Lying, Quarrelling, and others of a flagitious Nature, yet are many
Persons so estrang’d to Religion, and even to rational Ethicks, as to be
entirely supine and negligent in the suppressing of Impure Cogitations;
and on the contrary entertain them with indulgence; so that by degrees,
illimitable Passions are establish’d, and the tide of Impurity, at last
grows so strong and rapid, that it is not to be repell’d; whence all
manner of Evils succeed.

Having Theologically discuss’d the several particulars relating to
Self-pollution, and other Uncleanness: I come now to my last head,
treating of _Generation_, and the sensitive Parts effecting it; but I
would by no means have my Reader think, that I examine these particulars
with a design to excite Persons to Lewdness, when my Intentions are only
to shew the fineness and Beauty of the Parts, whereby will appear how
easily they may be violated and impair’d by an unnatural use.




[Illustration]

                              _CHAP._ III.
 _A __DISSERTATION__ upon _Generation_; and of the _Parts_ administring
                              thereunto._


I shall begin with the instruments of _Generation_ in Men. All the parts
of _Generation_ merit the Title of noble Parts, as well as the Brain and
the Heart; and some Authors give them the preference before the other
Parts of the Body, upon this consideration, that they preserve the
Species, and the others only keep up the Individuum.

The Yard is call’d by Physicians the _Membrum Virile_, because it
distinguishes a Man from a Woman: It is plac’d at the lower and external
part of the _Abdomen_, and is fasten’d to the _Os Pubis_. This Situation
is the more commodious, for that it does not annoy any other part in the
time of enjoyment.

It has a very peculiar Substance, containing several Vessels, Muscles,
Nerves, Arteries, _&c._ Its Skin is finer than that of any other part,
to give it a more exquisite sense. It has no Fat; for if it encreas’d in
Flesh in proportion with the rest of the Body; it would not only be of
too large a size, but become soft, unactive, and insensible; and would
cloud the Sense necessary to excite the Passion.

The Yard performs its motions by virtue of four Muscles; two for
Erection, and two for Ejaculation. These last squeeze the seminal
Vesicles, and convey the Seed into the _Urethra_, from whence it sallies
out with great force: It is divided into its Body, and two Ends; as for
its two extremities one of them is call’d the Glans, or head of the
Yard; the other which is fastened to the Belly, is call’d the Root, and
is surrounded with Hair, especially upon its upper part, which is call’d
the _Pubis_.

The Glans, or head of the _Membrum Virile_, is the only fleshy part in
the Yard; being soft and smooth, to prevent its hurting the Matrix of
the Woman, and running in some measure to a point to facilitate its
Entry: It is cover’d with a thin Membrane, which renders it sensible of
the Titillation occasion’d by rubbing upon the Matrix; and in the time
of Erection, the Spirits and Blood repair to it vigorously, when it
swells and starts out of an uncommon length, assuming a lively red
Colour; but upon the retreat of the Blood, it flaggs and becomes pale
and shrivell’d.

The _prepuce_ is the loose Skin at the utmost end of the Yard, which
stretches out and covers the Nut, or draws down, to uncover it, as there
is occasion: In time of Erection, it will draw down the Yard a
considerable way, the easier to enter in Copulation: ’Tis tied under the
Nut, with a fine Ligament call’d the Bridle, which must be cut when it
is to short, and draws the orifice of the Nut downwards, by reason it
hinders the Ejaculation of the Seed in a straight Line. The Prepuce
enlarges the pleasure in Copulation, especially of the Women.

The Yard has two Cavernous Bodies, one on each side, taking their rise
from the lower part of the _Os Pubis_, and the Hip-bone, and these
cavernous Bodies, or Nerves have two Substances, external and internal,
the external one is thick, hard, and nervous, and the internal one, is
spungy, thin, and fungous.

The Erection of the Yard is owing to these cavernous Bodies, which being
fill’d with Spirits, swell and extend themselves: And the arterious
Blood being poured into the cavernous Bodies effects the distension of
the Yard, as its lankness is occasion’d by sending of that Blood through
the Hypogastrick Veins. The spungy Substance of the cavernous Bodies,
stops the Blood for some time, whereby an erection is forc’d.

In all Enjoyments, the animal Spirits are rouz’d by fancy, which strikes
the _Idea_ of Pleasure, and when the Spirits are thus rais’d, they
instantly repair to the Nerves of the Organs of _Generation_, and puff
them up on mixing with the Blood, convey’d thither by the Arteries; and
upon the mixture of these two, a Fermentation succeeds, whereby an
Erection is effected.

The _Urethra_ is a nervous Passage, extending from the neck of the
Bladder, to the end of the Yard. It is a common passage for the Seed and
Urine.

The Testicles are so call’d from the Latin Word _Testes_, as they
witness the vigour of a Man. They are seated without the Abdomen, at the
root of the Yard; and enclos’d in the Scrotum, which is a Purse
consisting of two Membranes; these Vessels do not prepare or form the
Seed; but their office is to import the Blood from which ’tis separated.

The Testicles are of an oval Figure, about the size of a Pigeons Egg,
and in some larger: They are wrapt up in five Coats or fine Skins,
_viz._ The _Scrotum_, _Dartos_, _Eritroides_, _Elitroides_, and the
_Albuginea_; the two first are call’d common, and the three last are
call’d proper. The outer Coat is shrivell’d and encompass’d with thin
Hair. The Substance of the Testicle, is white, soft, and loose, compos’d
of several small Seminals Vessels, and Capillaries, which are the
Branches of the Arteries, Veins, Nerves, and Lymphatick Vessels.

There are two Muscles call’d _Cremasters_, which keep the Stones
suspended; and if these happen to be stronger than ordinary, they’ll
move the Testicles of themselves.

The most volatile part of the Blood is strain’d out from the rest by the
Glandulous Pith of the Testicle, which gives passage only to the finest
Particles, and obliges the rest to return to the Veins. This part of the
Blood thus filtrated, is rais’d to a just degree of perfection by the
length of the Pipes, through which it passes; and what adds to its
refinement is the windings of these Pipes, which procure a mutual
disunion, by whirling about. When the Seed is prepar’d, it is lodg’d in
the expansion of the _Vasa Deferentia_; being first put in motion by the
Heat of the Vein call’d the _Spermatick Artery_; and when the
Imagination is enflam’d by amorous Thoughts, it suddenly breaks forth.

The _Vasa Deferentia_ are Vessels seated partly in the _Scrotum_, and
partly in the _Abdomen_; they convey the Seed by drops to the seminal
Vesicles; the two extremities of the _Vasa Deferentia_ are compar’d to a
Bunch of Grapes, and Guts of Birds.

Two small Ducts of about an Inch in length, spring from these Vesicles;
they are broad near the Vesicles, but dwindle as they approach to the
_Urethra_, which they perforate. These Ducts are call’d Ejaculatory
Vessels, because in the heat of Action, they throw the Seed of the
Vesicles into the _Urethra_, and they are the chief Subjects of the
pleasure attending Ejaculation.

These small Ducts have ten or twelve Orifices, opening to the _Urethra_,
each of them being shut by a small Caruncle to prevent the continual
efflux of Humour, which has the precedency of the Seed. This is alledg’d
to be the seat of a Clap, by reason volatile Salts fastning near,
occasion Ulcers that corrode the Caruncles, and thereupon the Orifices
of the Ducts discharge their slimy Liquor.

The _Prostatæ_ are two Glandulous spungy Bodies, seated at the root of
the Yard, by the head of the _Urethra_, and furnish’d with Arteries from
the _Pudendæ_; their use is to make a secretion of slimy oily Liquor out
of the Blood, to reserve it for some time in its Vesicles, and to
squeeze it out by degrees, thro’ the Pipes of the small Ducts, to the
_Urethra_.

’Tis reported, that some Persons have three Testicles, and that others
are so slenderly provided, as to have but one; tho’ either of the cases
happens very rarely. And Animals which have their Testicles situated
within, are always accounted more lascivious than others.

There are four _spermatick Vessels_ belonging to the Privy Parts of a
Man, two whereof are Arteries, and the other two Veins. The two
spermatick Arteries spring from the Trunk of the _Aorta_; and run
obliquely upon the _Ureters_, and along the _Muscle Posas_, ’till they
arrive at the _Groin_, where they are receiv’d by a production of the
_Peritonæum_, and so conducted to the Testicles.

The two spermatick Veins branch out from the Testicles towards the _Vena
Cava_. The Right extends it self straight to the Trunk of the _Cava_;
but the Left terminates in the emulgent Vein. In their progress, they
are join’d by small Veins from the _Peritonæum_, and the neighbouring
Muscles, which are loaded with the superfluous Blood of those parts, in
order to lodge it in the _Cava_.

The spermatick Vessels are larger in Men than Women; and in both Sexes
the Arteries are always stronger than the Veins. For the use of these
Vessels, the Blood runs in the two Arteries straight to the Testicles,
each of them dividing into two small Branches, the better to penetrate
its Substance, by entring at several places, and to procure an exact
separation of the seminal Particles, that accompany the Arterious Blood.
And when this is perfected, the remainder of the Blood enters the
Branches of the Veins, in order to return to the _Cava_.

The _Valves_ in the Cavity of the Veins are plac’d at certain Intervals,
in order to prevent the Arterious Blood from falling down. They are
serviceable in promoting the ascent of the Blood, and their natural
Disposition conducts it to the _Vena Cava_.


                 _Of the _Privy Parts_ of a __WOMAN__._

To pursue the method I have hitherto observ’d, I shall begin my
Description of the Privities of a Woman, with the external Parts.

The external Orifice is commonly call’d the _Pudendum_; ’tis compos’d of
several parts, as the _Pubes_, the _Mons Veneris_, the Lips, and the
great Slit.

The _Pubes_ is seated on the forepart of the Share-bone, just above the
_Pudendum_; and to keep off the annoyance that might arise from the
hardness of the Bones in the amorous Adventure, it is rais’d and
consists of Fat, which serves as a Cushion.

_Mons Veneris_, rises like a little Hill about the great Lips, and is
cover’d, as well as the _Pubes_, with a pretty good quantity of rough
curling Hair, which begins to spring when the Female enters her
Thirteenth or Fourteenth Year: It is seated a little lower than the
_Pubes_.

The great _Labia_, or great Lips, descend from the _Mons Veneris_, and
meet in the _Perinæum_; they consist of doubled Skin, Fat and spungy
Flesh; they are cover’d with Hair, but it is not so strong, as that of
the _Pubes_ and _Mons Veneris_. In Girls they are firm, but in those who
have been enjoy’d, they are flaggy.

The great Slit is the space between the two Lips; it is call’d the great
Slit, as being much larger than the entry of the Neck of the Womb.

Upon separating the Thighs, and drawing aside the two Lips, are
discover’d two soft and spungy Excrescences call’d _Nymphæ_; they
resemble the Thrills, that hang under a Cock’s Throat; and their Colour
is red, like that of a Cock’s Comb; their Substance is partly fleshy,
and partly membranous, consisting of the doubled, and the inner Skin of
the _Great Labia_. The _Nymphæ_ conduct forth the Urine; and of Virgins
are so vigorous, that they discharge their Water with a Noise like
hissing.

Above the _Nymphæ_ within the great Cleft is situated the _Clitoris_, a
long round and glandulous Body. This is said to be the principal seat of
Pleasure, being endow’d with an exquisite Sense. In the heat of
Enjoyment, it swells like unto a Mans Yard on an Erection, by virtue of
the Blood and Spirits, that croud into it. For this reason it is call’d
the Female Yard, and indeed, it appears like unto that of a Man in many
particulars. This is the part for Friction.

There are two Cavernous Nerves coming from the Hip-bone, call’d the Legs
of the _Clitoris_; and there are four Muscles in the _Clitoris_, two for
Erection, and two for Ejaculation; the two first run from the Hip-bone
under the Cavernous Nerves; and the two others call’d _Pudendi_, take
their rise from the Sphincter of the _Anus_. These Muscles serve to
straighten the Orifice of the _Vagina_. The _Arteriæ Pudendæ_ furnish
the _Clitoris_ with Blood, and the Veins of that Name carry off the same
Blood into the _Cava_.

Under the _Clitoris_ is the urinary Passage, larger and shorter than
that of a Man, whereby Women send forth their Urine with the greatest
violence and dispatch. This Passage is surrounded with a Sphincter,
which is a Muscle that serves to confine, or give passage for the Urine
at pleasure.

Between the fleshy Fibres of the _Urethra_, and the Membrane of the
_Vagina_, lie the _Prostates_, having several Channels which terminate
in the lower part of the _Vulva_, and thereby discharge a slimy matter,
which mixes with the seed of the Male, in the time of Enjoyment.

And between the two great _Labia_, appear the four Caruncles call’d
_Myrtiformes_ from the resemblance they bear to _Mirtle-berries_. They
are small fleshy Eminences surrounding the small Slit, made of the
fleshy Wrinkles of the _Vagina_, which render the Passage so much the
straighter. Their use is to heighten the mutual pleasure of Enjoyment,
by clinging round and locking up the Yard; and to facilitate the egress
of the Child by extension. They are reddish firm and high in Virgins,
and join’d sideways to one another by small Membranes, which tie them
together, and make them resemble a Rose-bud half blown: But in other
Women they are separated by the entry of the Yard.

The uniting of the Membranes of the _Carunculæ Myrtiformes_, straighten
the Passage, and afford the true mark of _Virginity_, (if there be any
such.) The pain of the first Adventure is owing to the forcing of the
Passage through, and tearing off those small Membranes; and a Mans
Inclinations being always heighten’d in the first Nights Enjoyment, the
pain to the Female is encreas’d by his ardent struggles; her Virgin
Sufferings augmenting with his affection: But in some Females the
_Caruncles_ are rang’d in such a manner, that the Yard may enter without
violence, so that there is no certain Evidence of a Maiden-head.

Some _Anatomists_ mention a Membrane call’d _Hymen_, seated near the
_Caruncles_ in the _Vagina_, which continues stretched over the Passage,
‘till the approach of a Man rends it; and that this _Hymen_ is a mark of
_Virginity_; but this is more imaginary than proceeding from any
Demonstration.

The _Vagina_ is the neck of the Womb, a round Passage between the outer
and inner Orifice, which receives the Yard like a Sheath. In Women that
never bore Children, this Neck is about four Inches long, and an Inch
and a half broad, but after Child-bearing, its capacity cannot be
limited. It is nervous, and somewhat spungy, consisting of two
Membranes; the Wrinkles of its inner Membrane empower it to prolong,
dilate or contract, in order to fit the Yard, of any length or size, and
to afford a Passage to the _Fœtus_. The Body and Neck of the Womb, make
the Figure of a Bottle turn’d upside down, or rather a proud Flask.

The inner Orifice of the Womb, is a perforation like the Head of a Man’s
Yard; ’tis the beginning of a narrow Passage, which enlarges to afford a
way for whatever enters or comes from the Womb; it opens to receive the
Seed in the moment of Ejaculation; and upon Conception shuts close, and
so continues till towards the last Month of the Woman’s Reckoning: It is
compos’d of Membranes wrinkled and furl’d up, capable of dilating
themselves to a great extent. This is the part which gives the Woman
pain in Child Birth, the Orifice being small, and opening but gradually,
pursuant to the Efforts of the _Fœtus_, which retards the Birth. After
the Child is past; this Orifice is lost, and the whole Womb is only one
large Cavity reaching from the entry of its Neck to the bottom; but this
is of very short duration, for these parts very soon contract themselves
like an empty Purse, and resume their natural posture. The Action of
this inner Orifice is purely natural.

The Substance of the bottom of the Womb is Membranous, and about a
Fingers breadth thick, so that it dilates its self very commodiously:
The inner Surface is interlac’d with a great many small Pores, and
little Vessels which distil the menstrual Blood in Monthly Quantities.

The Womb has Nerves, Arteries, and Veins, dispers’d. The Nerves give it
a sense of Pleasure and Pain, and a sympathy with all parts of the Body:
The Arteries and Veins are call’d the _Spermatick_ and _Hypogastrick_,
and consist of an infinite number of Branches springing from all parts
of the Womb, exporting the Blood to the Trunk of the _Vena Cava_: The
Womb is sprinkled on all sides with Blood imported by the Arteries.
These Arteries not only furnish the Womb with a proper Nourishment, but
also pour in Blood upon the _Placenta_, in order to be sent through the
Navel String to the _Fœtus_. When a Woman is not with Child, this Blood
slips away thro’ the several Vessels into the Cavity of the Womb, and
from thence it passes the _Vagina_ every Month. In teeming Women these
Branches sometimes discharge Blood, when there is a greater quantity
than is necessary for the Nourishment of the Child.

The spermatick _Artery_ divides it self into two Branches, one repairing
to the Testicle, and the other to the Womb. It carries Blood in one of
its Branches to the Testicle, in order to the secretion of Seed, and by
the other Branch it furnishes the Womb with Blood for its Nourishment,
and the superfluous Blood is carried back by two Branches of Veins, one
from the Testicle, and the others from the Womb.

The Testicles of a Woman are call’d _Ovaria_; and they differ in
Situation, Figure and Substance from those of Men. They are seated
within the _Abdomen_ upon the sides of the bottom of the Womb. Some
Writers are of opinion, that Nature plac’d the Testicles of Women within
to heat the Seed and work it up to a degree of perfection: Others tell
us, that the design of this Situation was to excite Women to Generation.
The use of the Testicles is to filtrate the Seed and reserve it; and to
perform at once the office of a Man’s Testicles.

Their Figure is broad and flat, (seldom exceeding the Substance of a
small Pigeons Egg) they are tied and held fast by some part of the Flag
of the Trumpet; and they are knit to the spermatick Vessels, which grow
larger after the Egg has taken Root in the Womb. For their Substance,
they are a collection of Vesicles, commonly took for Eggs. In the
_Ovarium_ of a Woman are a Million of fine small Blood Vessels dispers’d
upon the Tunicles; and small imperceivable _Glandules_, that strain out
a white milky Liquor, which attains perfection in the cavity of these
Vesicles, and then composes the matter of the Egg, which includes the
Sperm that contains the _Fœtus_.

The more volatile part of the Seed of a Man passes through the _Tubæ_ to
the _Ovarium_, in order to fecundate the Eggs. The _Tubæ_ are of the
form of a Trumpet, which gives them their Name: They take rise from the
bottom of the Womb, and their Orifice, which is continually open, is
lac’d round with small Membranes like a Fringe, and is call’d the
_Devil’s-bit_, or the Flag of the Trumpet. The office of the _Tubæ_, is
to facilitate the descent of the Egg into the Womb. The seminal Spirit
puts the _Tubæ_ in motion, whereby the jagged part embraces the
_Ovarium_, and the Egg fermented by the Spirits of the Seed, insensibly,
disengages it self from the _Ovarium_, and breaking its Membrane, enters
the _Tubæ_, in order to descend into the Cavity of the Womb: And in case
of Twins, or where two or three Children are Born; they always spring
from the like number of Eggs, disengag’d from the _Ovarium_ at the same
time. The extremities of the _Tubæ_ inserted into the bottom of the Womb
are call’d the _Horns_.

The Womb is cover’d with the _Peritonæum_; and a peculiar Membrane which
lines the whole inside; and the bottom is generally smooth and even, but
the Neck is always furl’d. The Ligaments are nothing else but
Productions of the _Peritonæum_, which come from the Loins, and are
inserted in the bottom of the Womb to prevent its falling down upon the
Neck: They likewise keep the Womb from mounting too high: When these
Ligaments are unbent, they resemble Bats Wings.

There are several _Lymphatick Vessels_ belonging to the Womb, which
creep along its outer part, and after a reuniting into large parts,
empty themselves into the Cistern of the Chyle.

The Womb has a short Neck, distinguish’d by that Name from the _Vagina_;
it is the Passage which reaches from the inner Orifice to the principal
Cavity of the Womb: It is about an Inch long.

In the Cavity of the Womb, the two _Horns_ dilate themselves, and form
particular Bags, each of which contains a _Fœtus_. This Cavity enlarges
itself more or less in proportion to the bigness of the _Fœtus_, or the
number of Children, as in case of Twins.

The Womb is seated in the lower part of the _Hypogastrium_, between the
straight Gut and the Bladder. The Cavity where ’tis lodg’d, is call’d
the _Pelvis_ or _Basin_, and is larger in Women than in Men, so as to
give the Womb liberty to distend it self upon Impregnation; it is tied
fast at the bottom, and at the Neck. The Neck is knit before to the
Bladder, and the Share-bone, and behind to the straight Gut and the _Os
Sacrum_. The bottom is not tied so fast as the Neck, it requiring more
liberty to move and dilate it self; but to prevent the shifting of its
Seat, the Ligaments are equipp’d, being four in Number, two above, and
two below.

Having describ’d the Privities of Man and Woman: I come now to my
dissertation upon the _Generation_ of Man, and the more particular use
and dimensions of the Parts employ’d therein.


                   _Of the _Generation_ of __MAN__._

An Animal cannot be produc’d without a Couple, _viz._ a Male and a
Female, each of which performs its part in the work of _Generation_.

Their entring on this work is call’d Copulation, which is the joining of
the Male to the Female: And both of them are equally transported with a
furious and restless Passion, occasion’d by a mix’d motion of pleasure
and pain in the _Genitals_, which strongly excites a desire for each
other.

As this Enjoyment is natural, there needs no Instruction; Instinct in
all Animals directs the way of acting, that is most convenient for
propagating their Species: And a Man, though brought up in never so
great Ignorance, at his Age of Maturity naturally enclines to it, and
needs no other Guide but the dictates of Nature to find out the center
of Enjoyment.

But if Nature had not planted in the _Genitals_ a sense of extraordinary
pleasure in the amorous Engagement, Man would seldom give himself the
trouble of Copulation: The cause of this pleasure some impute to the
mixing of Spirits with the Seed, which give a pleasing tickling; and
that this is encreas’d by the fineness and bending of the _Nervous
Fibres_ of the parts: Others are of opinion, that the Salt in the Seed,
and the Spirits accompanying, prick the parts through which they pass
and occasion such an agreeable Titillation: And some give this reason
for the pleasure, that as in Eating we have an Enjoyment, which no part
but the Tongue and Palate partake of; so in Copulation a peculiar
pleasure arises, of which the _Generation_ Organs are only sensible; and
that Animals are mov’d to the Act of _Generation_, as they are to
Eating.

The tickling Pleasure which affects Women, proceeds from the Emotion,
that is excited when the Seed disengages it self from the Testicle, and
passes through the Cavities of the ejaculatory Vessels, in order to be
darted into the Womb. When a Woman is not with Child, the Seed is thrown
into the Womb by the shortest Vessel, and when she is pregnant, the Seed
is thrown into the Neck of the Womb by the longest Branch: And for this
reason, big-belly’d Women are more passionately fond of Embraces than
others; for the Seed spending more time in its intricate Passage, raises
a more transporting and lasting Titillation.

In respect to the Parts of a Man employ’d in the work of _Generation_,
the Yard when lank cannot go about it; and it may be so stiff, as not to
be proper: And sometimes the erection of the Yard is so strong, that it
is always bent: A large Yard does not stand so readily, as a small one;
and when it does it cannot subsist so long, by reason it requires more
Blood to fill it; and when full, it is heavier, and consequently apt to
fall in a very little time: And the business of _Generation_ suffers no
alteration from the shortness or length of the Yard within the Neck of
the Womb; for the office of the two round Ligaments, is to enforce the
bottom of the Womb to approach the head of the Yard, in order to receive
the Seed in time of Ejaculation: But ’tis as difficult a matter to
perswade some Lascivious Females, that a Yard of small Dimensions is
equally useful and pleasurable to one of a considerable Longitude and
Circumference, as it is to perswade a Club of Ravenous Stomachs, that a
thin shrivell’d Shoulder of Mutton is of equal Goodness with a Haunch of
well-fed Venison.

The parts of Women frequently differ in their Extent and Furniture; a
great many Husbands are such Fools, as to covet difficulty in their
first Approaches; and to measure the Virtue of their Wives, by the
labour of their consummating Attack; not considering Nature has so
order’d, that the Privy Parts are in the same Condition with the Mouth
and the Eyes; some are little, and others are large; so that those who
have naturally the larger size, may be unjustly charg’d with Lewdness;
and on the other hand, those, who by the natural disposition of the
Parts are straighter, may after Copulation be reputed Virgins. A Little
Woman may have a large Mouth, _&c._ and a large Woman a little one,
whereby the lesser Person may have the more capacious Privities: And the
same rule may be observ’d in Men, in respect to the Nose, which seems to
have equal Authority in determining the Dimensions nature has provided
in the Male, as the Mouth or Eyes in the Female.

Nature does not always observe an exact rule of _Symmetry_, the visible
Limbs and Parts are oftentimes disproportion’d; we frequently see a
large personable Man, supported with slender Legs, and a Dwarf equip’d
with large nervous Calves; and the same want of proportion is certainly
to be found in the Privities.

I have known a wanton Female marry a Person of an extraordinary Stature,
in expectation of a large Pleasure, with Sorrow confess she was greatly
mistaken. And as a strong Soil does not constantly afford the most
plentiful Crop of productive Grain; so the Privy Parts of a robust
Person, are not always stock’d with the greatest quantity of surrounding
Ornaments.

But to return to the Privy Parts of Women; in some extraordinary cases,
the Lips of the _Matrix_, may be so closely join’d, that a Yard of the
smallest Size, cannot possibly enter (when they are to be artfully
separated by a Surgeon:) And in other Females the Passage is so wide,
that the largest Member will make its way without the least difficulty:
And I at this time know a Gentleman very well provided in the parts of
_Generation_ (beyond what is common) that has had three Wives, all of
them of unspotted Reputations, and the oldest not above Nineteen; who
affirms that the Nights of consummation with each of his Spouses; he was
in quite to the Testicles in his first penetrating attempt.

The same Gentleman has declar’d, that in his Youth, when his Curiosity
led him to the utmost variety; he has sometimes met with a Lady of
Pleasure, whose Parts must be suppos’d to be extended to the utmost
latitude of Nature, and to which upon Examination, no binding
Preparations had been applied; that he could not possibly enter in the
most encountering Embrace, which sufficiently shews the incertainty of
Nature, and the difficulty attending the proof of Virginity. And this
Gentleman is of the same Opinion with many others, that a narrow
entrance to the Privy Parts of a Female, very much impedes a mutual
Enjoyment.

Thus much for the Dimensions of the Privities: I now proceed to
_Generation_. When the Fancy warm’d with an _Idea_ of Pleasure,
occasions a diffusion of the Animal Juice, of Consequence ensues
Erection: An Erection being effected, and the Yard lodg’d in the Neck of
the Womb; the Seed taking leave of the seminal Vesicles, passes through
the Ejaculatory Vessels, and enters the _Urethra_; from whence ’tis
squirted out with a Jirk, by vertue of the Convulsions that then seize
the Yard: And as Ejaculation the last point of the Man’s Action, is the
critical moment of pleasure, so ’tis the principal aim, he has in View,
and all the Circumstances that usher it in, have an eye upon that
Instant: The sanguine Person is the most amorous, and produces the
greatest quantity of laudable Seed.


The Seed of a Man being syring’d into the Privy Parts of a Woman by the
Yard, it repairs to the bottom of the Womb, and its inner Orifice shuts
it self close: ‘After which the Seed being embrac’d and press’d by the
Womb, all its Particles begin to take their respective Posts; the
subtilest continue in the Center, and consequently the grosser and
superfluous Parts are thrust towards the Surface, where they produce the
After-birth, the Navel-string, and the Membranes, in which the _Fœtus_
is wrapt. In the mean time all the Particles calculated for forming the
different parts of the Body, disengage themselves by the force of their
motion, and either part or join according to their mutual Disparity or
Conformity; so that those design’d for the head Assemble in the place
where they ought to be; and those for the rest of the Body do the like:
And at the same time among those calculated for the Head, the Particles
qualify’d for forming the Eyes, Ears, _&c._ rendezvous in their proper
places: The same may be said of the Particles of which the Breast,
Belly, and Limbs are compos’d. The Form, Structure, Order and Connection
of all these parts, depends chiefly upon the Spirit enclos’d within the
Seed; which by the meer necessity of its Motions, and without any
Knowledge or Understanding, unravels the _Chaos_ where the Particles lay
confus’d, and ranks them in the same Order, that they had when lodg’d in
the Body of the Animals, from which they sprung. The parts of the
_Fœtus_ being thus form’d, the subtilest part of the Spirit continues in
the Center of the new-form’d Body, _i. e._ the Heart; and there makes a
sort of Fire without Light (being the natural Heat that gives Life)
which is fed by the circular motion of the Blood that passes there
incessantly.’ This is the most probable _Idea_ of forming the _Fœtus_,
and what passes in the Womb, that is given by any Ancient or Modern
Writers.

Some are of Opinion, that the _Fœtus_ is form’d of a mixture of the Male
and Female Seed; and that these two Seeds impregnated with the Spirit of
Life, are the agent and matter of _Generation_. Some alledge that the
Male Seed is sufficient of it self to form a _Fœtus_; and that the Woman
only gives it a lodging, and furnishes the necessary Blood for its
nourishment in the Womb: The Male being in this sense, look’d upon as an
accomplish’d and perfect piece of Work, and the Female only a fertile
Ground, which produces good Seed where the Labourer sows it well: And
others are of opinion, that the Woman’s Seed contains the first, and the
true Model of the _Fœtus_; there being small seminal Vesicles in the
Testicles of a Woman, call’d the Eggs; which contain within themselves,
all that is necessary to give the _Fœtus_ a Being.

But the most common and rational Opinion is, that of the _Fœtus_ being
form’d by the mixing of the two Seeds in the Womb; that Man and Woman
are equally perfect; and that both of them being furnish’d with
Testicles, which make a secretion of Seed, both of them must supply; and
a Woman cannot be got with Child, unless she and the Man ejaculate their
Seed at the same time.

Those enclining to believe, that the Male Seed is sufficient of it self
to form a _Fœtus_, plead that the Seed of a Man differs vastly from that
of a Woman: That the former is white, and of a thick consistence,
compos’d of all the parts that are capable to form a Body; and that the
latter is only a sharp and yellowish serosity, which cannot contribute
any thing towards the form of the _Fœtus_. But this is esteem’d by other
Persons a groundless fancy; for the Structure of a Woman’s Testicle is
more admirable than that of a Man, which shews that the Seed separated
by it, is of considerable use: And several Children have their Mothers
Features and Humour, which demonstrates that the Father, to whom they
oftentimes bear no resemblance, does not furnish all himself.

Those Persons who pretend that the Woman’s Seed contains the first, and
the true Model of the _Fœtus_, compare the Female Testicles to a bunch
of Grapes, or a Bee-hive; consisting of Vesicles, each of which contains
a little Animal, almost compleated in all its Parts, after the same
manner as the Egg of a Fowl: And that Man’s Seed contributes to
_Generation_, no otherwise than as it animates the Egg: But the Opinion
which is generally receiv’d, is that both the Male and the Female Seed
contain such Particles, as are qualify’d to form a Body and a Spirit
capable of all the Motions perform’d by the Animal, from which they have
Being; and that _Generation_ depends upon an exact mixture of the two
Seeds.

The Opinions relating to the matter whereof the Seed is compos’d, are no
less various than those of the forming of the _Fœtus_; some Anatomists
say, ’tis prepar’d by the concoction and conversion of Blood, effected
in this manner. The Blood imported to the Testicles by four spermatick
Vessels, two Arteries and two Veins: The Vein and Artery of the same
side, having a mutual Communication, blend the arterious and venous
Blood together; and this mixture of arterious and venous Blood boyl and
convert into Seed by the peculiar faculty and virtue of the Organs of
the Testicles: This was the Opinion of the Antients.

Others say, that the Seed is a Juice imported by the Nerves to the
Organs of _Generation_; and that it distills from the Brain to the
Privities; that in the time of Ejaculation one may feel it trickling
along the _Spina_ of the Back; that when the Adventure is over, the
Animal is feeble and dejected through the great Dissipation of the
Spirits that are hurry’d along with the Seed; and that the Seed is of
the same colour with the animal juice of the Nerves.

Other Anatomists tell ye the Seed is compos’d of an infinity of little
Animals, which they call seminary; that these swim and flutter about in
the Liquor, and may be easily discover’d with a Microscope; that these
seminal Animals are so many Seeds of Men, which being convey’d to the
_Ovarium_, strike at the first Egg they meet with; upon which one of
them perforates the Membrane, or gets into the Egg by a suppos’d
Orifice, and presently shuts it self up, leaving the rest to perish
without Doors, unless some of them have the good Fortune to slip into
another Egg. The Animal that enters the Egg, serves for _Sperm_, which
by swelling it up, prompts it to disengage it self from the _Ovarium_,
and tumble into the _Tuba_, which conducts it to the Womb.

But the most substantial reasons given for the composure of the Seed are
grounded upon Circulation, that the seminal Particles are separated and
filtrated from the Blood by the Testicles; and Anatomists acquainted
with the Structure of the Testicles, say, that the Seed is produc’d by a
continual Filtration of several Particles, which being gather’d into a
Body, make a Liquor that is qualify’d for the forming of a Man.

Mr. _Lamy_ in his Anatomical Discourses, says, that the same necessity
which obliges Plants after a set period of time to put forth the Seeds
which give being to others, does likewise influence Animals at a certain
Age to produce prolifick Seed, which he explains thus: The moisture of
Infancy being consum’d by the overpowering Heat, the Blood is crouded
with a greater number of Corpusculums qualified to nourish the Parts and
repair their Losses, than there is occasion for; so that a great number
of these nutritious Particles meeting with no reception in the
respective Parts, return along with the Blood. The Head sends back such
Particles as are proper for recomposing all the different Parts it is
made of; and so do the other parts. Now all these various sorts of
Particles being mix’d with the Blood, are strain’d through the
Testicles; after which they rally and compose a Humour which is the
sensible and corporeal part of the Seed of Man.

Seed is a very sweet Liquor when ’tis in a regular State, but when ’tis
long under confinement, it turns perfectly sower, and causes very
pernicious effects in both Male and Female. Men are harsher in their
Tempers, and frequently attack’d with Vapours to a degree; and Women are
thrown into a deplorable Condition, which will find no absolute Cure,
till the stagnating Seed is evacuated by Marriage: The Seed mixing with
the Blood breaks its Texture and changes its Consistence; so that by
rendring it more serous, liquid and cold, and by flattening the Redness
of the Blood, it makes the colour of the Skin less lively; and at length
occasions the _Virgins_ Distemper.

_Monsieur_ _DIONIS_ is of opinion, that most of the Nuns and other Girls
that are taken to be possess’d with Devils, were subject to Vapours only
when they acted the awkward extravagancies that History is full of. And
I have been inform’d by the learned Dr. _C——n_, and other eminent
Physicians, that Vapours will so powerfully prevail in some Young
Females, by a stagnation of the Seed, that they are oblig’d to prescribe
extraordinary Remedies, and sometimes Friction to procure relief; and to
prevent Convulsions, irregular Imaginations, _&c._ which would otherwise
ensue, if not a perfect Lunacy for a time.

An early Marriage is the most effectual Preservative against the
numerous Disorders proceeding from quantities of Seed unnaturally
confin’d; and will render a perfect Health and Tranquility; unless it be
in the case of Impotency; or in some Countries where a Man by tying a
Knot upon his Codpiece, when the Priest pronounces such and such Words
on the day of Marriage; lays claim to a right of preventing its
Consummation: But if a Man cannot consummate his Marriage, you’ll always
find it proceed from a natural Cause; and that the Devil has no hand in
it.

To conclude my Subject of _Generation_, and the Parts employ’d therein:
I shall here insert an Observation of St. _Augustin. The Instruments of
Generation (_says he_) are a call’d _Pudenda_, because they speak our
Shame in this, that he who commands all the other Parts, cannot reduce
these to Obedience._


                                _FINIS._

------------------------------------------------------------------------




                          TRANSCRIBER’S NOTES


 1. Silently corrected obvious typographical errors and variations in
      spelling.
 2. Retained archaic, non-standard, and uncertain spellings as printed.
 3. Enclosed italics font in _underscores_.

*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK ONANISM DISPLAY'D: ***

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions will
be renamed.

Creating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works,
so the Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribute it in the
United States without permission and without paying copyright
royalties. Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part
of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
concept and trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark,
and may not be used if you charge for an eBook, except by following
the terms of the trademark license, including paying royalties for use
of the Project Gutenberg trademark. If you do not charge anything for
copies of this eBook, complying with the trademark license is very
easy. You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose such as creation
of derivative works, reports, performances and research. Project
Gutenberg eBooks may be modified and printed and given away--you may
do practically ANYTHING in the United States with eBooks not protected
by U.S. copyright law. Redistribution is subject to the trademark
license, especially commercial redistribution.

START: FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full
Project Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
www.gutenberg.org/license.

Section 1. General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works

1.A. By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement. If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or
destroy all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your
possession. If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a
Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound
by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the
person or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph
1.E.8.

1.B. "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark. It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement. See
paragraph 1.C below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this
agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works. See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C. The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the
Foundation" or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection
of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works. Nearly all the individual
works in the collection are in the public domain in the United
States. If an individual work is unprotected by copyright law in the
United States and you are located in the United States, we do not
claim a right to prevent you from copying, distributing, performing,
displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as
all references to Project Gutenberg are removed. Of course, we hope
that you will support the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting
free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm
works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the
Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with the work. You can easily
comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the
same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg-tm License when
you share it without charge with others.

1.D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countries are
in a constant state of change. If you are outside the United States,
check the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this
agreement before downloading, copying, displaying, performing,
distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any
other Project Gutenberg-tm work. The Foundation makes no
representations concerning the copyright status of any work in any
country other than the United States.

1.E. Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other
immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear
prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work
on which the phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed,
performed, viewed, copied or distributed:

  This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
  most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
  restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
  under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
  eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the
  United States, you will have to check the laws of the country where
  you are located before using this eBook.

1.E.2. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is
derived from texts not protected by U.S. copyright law (does not
contain a notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the
copyright holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in
the United States without paying any fees or charges. If you are
redistributing or providing access to a work with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply
either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
obtain permission for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg-tm
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.3. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
additional terms imposed by the copyright holder. Additional terms
will be linked to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works
posted with the permission of the copyright holder found at the
beginning of this work.

1.E.4. Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5. Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6. You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including
any word processing or hypertext form. However, if you provide access
to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format
other than "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official
version posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm website
(www.gutenberg.org), you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense
to the user, provide a copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means
of obtaining a copy upon request, of the work in its original "Plain
Vanilla ASCII" or other form. Any alternate format must include the
full Project Gutenberg-tm License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7. Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8. You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
provided that:

* You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
  the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
  you already use to calculate your applicable taxes. The fee is owed
  to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he has
  agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation. Royalty payments must be paid
  within 60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are
  legally required to prepare) your periodic tax returns. Royalty
  payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in
  Section 4, "Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg
  Literary Archive Foundation."

* You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
  you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
  does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
  License. You must require such a user to return or destroy all
  copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and discontinue
  all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg-tm
  works.

* You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
  any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
  electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
  receipt of the work.

* You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
  distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work or group of works on different terms than
are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing
from the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the manager of
the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark. Contact the Foundation as set
forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
Gutenberg-tm collection. Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may
contain "Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate
or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or
other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or
cannot be read by your equipment.

1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees. YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from. If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium
with your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you
with the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in
lieu of a refund. If you received the work electronically, the person
or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second
opportunity to receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund. If
the second copy is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing
without further opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO
OTHER WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5. Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of
damages. If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement
violates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the
agreement shall be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or
limitation permitted by the applicable state law. The invalidity or
unenforceability of any provision of this agreement shall not void the
remaining provisions.

1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in
accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the
production, promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, harmless from all liability, costs and expenses,
including legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of
the following which you do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this
or any Project Gutenberg-tm work, (b) alteration, modification, or
additions or deletions to any Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any
Defect you cause.

Section 2. Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of
computers including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers. It
exists because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations
from people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come. In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future
generations. To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see
Sections 3 and 4 and the Foundation information page at
www.gutenberg.org

Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non-profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service. The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541. Contributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent permitted by
U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's business office is located at 809 North 1500 West,
Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up
to date contact information can be found at the Foundation's website
and official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without
widespread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine-readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment. Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States. Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements. We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance. To SEND
DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular
state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg web pages for current donation
methods and addresses. Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations. To
donate, please visit: www.gutenberg.org/donate

Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works

Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project
Gutenberg-tm concept of a library of electronic works that could be
freely shared with anyone. For forty years, he produced and
distributed Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of
volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as not protected by copyright in
the U.S. unless a copyright notice is included. Thus, we do not
necessarily keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
edition.

Most people start at our website which has the main PG search
facility: www.gutenberg.org

This website includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.